South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3521.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 63-3-40(A) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (A) The General Assembly shall elect a number of family court judges from each judicial circuit as follows: 22 First Circuit Four Judges 23 Second Circuit Two Judges 24 Third Circuit Three Judges 25 Fourth Circuit Three Judges 26 Fifth Circuit Four Judges 27 Sixth Circuit Two Judges 28 Seventh Circuit Four Judges 29 Eighth Circuit Three Judges 30 Ninth Circuit Six Judges 31 Tenth Circuit Three Judges 32 Eleventh Circuit ThreeFive Judges 33 Twelfth Circuit Three Judges 34 Thirteenth Circuit Six Judges 35 Fourteenth Circuit Three Judges 36 Fifteenth Circuit Three Judges 37 Sixteenth Circuit Three Judges. SECTION 2.  The Judicial Merit Selection Commission shall begin the process of nominating candidates for the judicial offices authorized by the provisions of SECTION 1. The General Assembly then shall elect these judges from the nominees of the commission; except that, the nominating process may not begin until funding for the additional judges is provided in the general appropriations act. SECTION 3.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----